Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201916-712
City funds; depositories; payment; conflict of interest.

The city treasurer of a city of the first class shall deposit, and at all times keep on deposit, for safekeeping, in banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions of approved and responsible standing, all money collected, received, or held by him or her as city treasurer. Such deposits shall be subject to all regulations imposed by law or adopted by the city council for the receiving and holding thereof. The fact that a stockholder, director, or other officer of such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution shall also be serving as mayor, as a member of the city council, as a member of a board of public works, or as any other officer of such city shall not disqualify such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution from acting as a depository for such city funds. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 84, p. 293;

R.S.1913, § 4980;

C.S.1922, § 4149;

C.S.1929, § 16-711;

Laws 1935, c. 140, § 3, p. 516;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-711;

R.S.1943, § 16-712;

Laws 1957, c. 54, § 2, p. 263;

Laws 1959, c. 48, § 1, p. 235;

Laws 1969, c. 84, § 3, p. 425;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 18;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 19;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 180;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 79.